Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,171
Beekeeping; abandoned apiary; seized by department; notice.

Any apiary not regularly attended in accordance with good beekeeping practice and which constitutes a disease, parasite, or pest hazard to the beekeeping industry may be considered an abandoned apiary and may be seized by the department. Any diseased bee equipment may be burned and the remainder may be sold at public auction, with proceeds after the cost of the sale are deducted to be returned to the former owner or his or her estate, except that before burning any such equipment or causing the same to be sold, the department shall give the owner or person in charge thereof a written notice at least ten days prior to the date on which the property will be burned or sold. Such notice shall be given by registered or certified mail or personally served upon the owner or person in charge of such property.

Laws 1929, c. 9, § 7, p. 79;

C.S.1929, § 81-2707;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,171;

Laws 1961, c. 426, § 2, p. 1332;

Laws 1965, c. 548, § 7, p. 1758;

Laws 1967, c. 583, § 4, p. 1967;

Laws 1976, LB 722, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 548, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 1001, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 48;

Laws 1994, LB 1071, § 9;

Laws 2004, LB 835, § 5.